New Jersey, session 222, A1051.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. As used in this section: "Board" means the Board of Public Utilities. "Broker" means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51). "Electric power supplier" means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51). "Electric public utility" means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51). "Energy agent" means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51). "Energy business" means a broker; electric power supplier; energy agent; gas supplier; marketer; or board-licensed energy agent, energy consultant, or private energy aggregator. "Energy year" means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51). "Gas public utility" means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51). "Gas supplier" means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51). "Marketer" means the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51). b.    No later than one year after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.          ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the board shall establish a program to promote women-owned, minority-owned, veteran-owned, and lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, or questioning (LGBTQ)-owned energy businesses through the use of public information campaigns, marketing, advertising, the provision of incentives, or other means and methods determined appropriate by the board. The program shall include the goal that the following percentages of natural gas and electricity purchased by business customers and public entities through board-licensed energy agents, energy consultants, or private energy aggregators utilizing retail choice be sourced utilizing a women-owned, minority-owned, veteran-owned, or LGBTQ-owned energy business: (1)   for the energy year next following the establishment of the program required by this subsection, five percent; (2)   for the second energy year following the establishment of the program required by this subsection, 11 percent; (3)   for the third energy year following the establishment of the program required by this subsection, 18 percent; and (4)   for the fourth energy year following the establishment of the program required by this subsection and for each energy year thereafter, 25 percent. c.     In order to qualify as a women-owned, minority-owned, veteran-owned, or LGBTQ-owned energy business for the purposes of this section, a business shall: (1)   be certified as a women-owned, minority-owned, veteran-owned, or LGBTQ-owned energy business by an appropriate State certifying organization; (2)   be certified as a women-owned, minority-owned, veteran-owned, or LGBTQ-owned energy business by an appropriate national certifying organization, including, but not limited to, the National Minority Supplier Development Council and the Womens Business Enterprise National Council; (3)   be registered to do business in the State; and (4)   have filed a current New Jersey Annual Report with the Division of Revenue and Enterprise Services in the Department of the Treasury. d.    A women-owned, minority-owned, veteran-owned, or LGBTQ-owned energy business that wishes to participate in the program established pursuant to this section shall apply to the board during an annual enrollment period.  The board shall establish an application process and a 60-day annual enrollment period for energy businesses to apply to the program pursuant to this subsection.  The board, and each electric and gas public utility in the State, shall post a list on its Internet website of the energy businesses approved by the board to participate in the program. e.     The board shall establish a means to track the progress of the program in meeting the goals established by subsection b. of this section.  The board shall post regularly updated progress updates from this tracking system on its Internet website. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.